Illinois, session 104th, SB74.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the State 5Agency Retainage Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Retainage" means a portion of money withheld from the 8payment of a contract for a specified period of time to ensure 9that a contractor or subcontractor completes a construction 10project in the manner specified in the contract. "Retainage" 11does not include moneys withheld due to violations of local, 12State, or federal laws.13    "State agency" has the meaning given to "State agencies" 14in Section 1-7 of the Illinois State Auditing Act. 15    Section 10. Determination of satisfactory progress. If a 16State agency determines that satisfactory progress has not 17been achieved by a contractor or subcontractor during any 18period for which a payment is to be made, a percentage of the 19payment may be retained by the State agency. Retainage may not 20be used as a substitute for good contract management, and the 21State agency may not withhold funds without cause. 22Determinations to retain and the specific amount to be   SB0074- 2 -LRB104 05978 JRC 16011 b1withheld must be made by the State agency on a case-by-case 2basis. These determinations must be based on an assessment of 3past performance and the likelihood that such performance will 4continue. The amount of retainage withheld may not exceed 10% 5of the contract amount until the contract is 50% completed, 6may not exceed 5% for the duration of the contract, and may be 7adjusted as the contract approaches completion to recognize 8better than expected performance, the ability to rely on 9alternative safeguards, and other factors. Upon completion of 10all contract requirements, amounts retained under this Act 11must be paid promptly. 12    Section 15. The State Prompt Payment Act is amended by 13changing Section 1 as follows: 14    (30 ILCS 540/1)  (from Ch. 127, par. 132.401)15    Sec. 1. This Act applies to any State official or agency 16authorized to provide for payment from State funds, by virtue 17of any appropriation of the General Assembly, for goods or 18services furnished to the State. This Act does not apply to 19retainage withheld under the State Agency Retainage Act. 20    For purposes of this Act, "goods or services furnished to 21the State" include but are not limited to (i) covered health 22care provided to eligible members and their covered dependents 23in accordance with the State Employees Group Insurance Act of 241971, including coverage through a physician-owned health   SB0074- 3 -LRB104 05978 JRC 16011 b1maintenance organization under Section 6.1 of that Act, (ii) 2prevention, intervention, or treatment services and supports 3for persons with developmental disabilities, mental health 4services, alcohol and substance abuse services, rehabilitation 5services, and early intervention services provided by a 6vendor, and (iii) prevention, intervention, or treatment 7services and supports for youth provided by a vendor by virtue 8of a contractual grant agreement. For the purposes of items 9(ii) and (iii), a vendor includes but is not limited to sellers 10of goods and services, including community-based organizations 11that are licensed to provide prevention, intervention, or 12treatment services and supports for persons with developmental 13disabilities, mental illness, and substance abuse problems, or 14that provides prevention, intervention, or treatment services 15and supports for youth. 16    For the purposes of this Act, "appropriate State official 17or agency" is defined as the Director or Chief Executive or his 18designee of that State agency or department or facility of 19such agency or department. With respect to covered health care 20provided to eligible members and their dependents in 21accordance with the State Employees Group Insurance Act of 221971, "appropriate State official or agency" also includes an 23administrator of a program of health benefits under that Act.24    As used in this Act, "eligible member" means a member who 25is eligible for health benefits under the State Employees 26Group Insurance Act of 1971, and "member" and "dependent" have   SB0074- 4 -LRB104 05978 JRC 16011 b1the meanings ascribed to those terms in that Act.2    As used in this Act, "a proper bill or invoice" means a 3bill or invoice, including, but not limited to, an invoice 4issued under a contractual grant agreement, that includes the 5information necessary for processing the payment as may be 6specified by a State agency and in rules adopted in accordance 7with this Act. Beginning on and after July 1, 2021, "a proper 8bill or invoice" shall also include the names of all 9subcontractors or subconsultants to be paid from the bill or 10invoice and the amounts due to each of them, if any.11    As used in this Act, "retainage" means a portion of money 12withheld from the payment of a contract for a specified period 13of time to ensure that a contractor or subcontractor completes 14a construction project in the manner specified in the 15contract. "Retainage" does not include moneys withheld due to 16violations of local, State, or federal laws. 17(Source: P.A. 100-549, eff. 1-1-18; 101-524, eff. 1-1-20.)